District of Columbia statutes.
2-1215.56

Adams Morgan BID.

(a)

Subject to review and approval by the Mayor under §§ 2-1215.05 and 2-1215.06, the formation of the Adams Morgan BID, including taxable property within the geographic areas set forth in subsection (b) of this section, is hereby authorized and the BID taxes established in subsection (c) of this section are hereby imposed through the expiration date of this subchapter [May 29, 2016] or the termination or dissolution of the BID.

(b)

The Adams Morgan BID shall be comprised of the geographic area along 17th Street, N.W., between Columbia Road, N.W., and Fuller Street, N.W.; along 18th Street, N.W., between Columbia Road, N.W., and Florida Avenue, N.W.; along Adams Mill Road, N.W., between Columbia Road, N.W., and Lanier Place, N.W.; along Belmont Road, N.W., between 18th Street, N.W., and Columbia Road, N.W.; along Biltmore Street, N.W., between Columbia Road, N.W., and Cliffbourne Place, N.W.; along California Street, N.W., between 18th Street, N.W., and Florida Avenue, N.W.; along Champlain Street, N.W., between Columbia Road, N.W., and Kalorama Road, N.W.; along Columbia Road, N.W., between 16th Street, N.W., and Wyoming Avenue, N.W.; along the north side of Florida Avenue, N.W., between 19th Street N.W., and California Street, N.W.; along Kalorama Road, N.W., between 18th Street, N.W., and Champlain Street, N.W.; along Lanier Place, N.W., between Ontario Road, N.W., and Adams Mill Road, N.W.; along Ontario Road, N.W., between Columbia Road, N.W., and Lanier Place, N.W.; along the north side of U Street, N.W., between 18th Street, N.W., and Florida Avenue, N.W.; along Vernon Street, N.W., between 18th Street, N.W., and 19th Street, N.W.; along Wyoming Avenue, N.W., between 19th Street, N.W., and Columbia Road, N.W.

(c)

The BID taxes for the taxable properties in the Adams Morgan BID shall be $.21 for each $100 in assessed value for all taxable properties and all commercial portions of mixed use properties.

History

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-134, § 206
as added by Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-56, § 2(b), 53 DCR 10
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-161, § 2(u), 61 DCR 10741

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-161 substituted “taxable property” for “nonexempt real property” in (a); and, in (c), substituted the first occurrence of “taxable properties” for “nonexempt real properties” and the second occurrence of “taxable properties” for “nonexempt properties.”

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Adams Morgan Business Improvement District Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-16, Sept. 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 9774).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Adams Morgan Business Improvement District Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-80, May 18, 2005, 52 DCR 5254).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Adams Morgan Business Improvement District Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-80, May 18, 2005, 52 DCR 5254).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Adams Morgan Business Improvement District Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-142, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7169).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(u) of the Business Improvement Districts Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-435, Oct. 7, 2014, 61 DCR 10717, 20 STAT 4154).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(u) of the Business Improvement Districts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-582, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1269, 21 STAT 735).

Mayor's Orders

Registration of the Adams Morgan Business Improvement District pursuant to the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996, (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code 2-1215.01 et seq. (2005 Supp.), see Mayor’s Order 2005-121, August 22, 2005 ( 52 DCR 8663).